Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-305 Accounts; records. Every
insurer shall keep full and adequate accounts and records of its assets,
obligations, transactions, and affairs. Every domestic insurer shall maintain
said accounts and records at its principal office in this State. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next